Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 17 Right-Of-Way

31-17-1.
Right-of-way in absence of signs or signals.

The driver of a vehicle approaching an intersection shall yield the right-of-way to a vehicle which has entered the intersection from a different highway.

When two vehicles enter an intersection from different highways at approximately the same time, the driver of the vehicle on the left shall yield the right-of-way to the vehicle on the right.

The right-of-way rules declared in subsections (a) and (b) of this section are modified at through highways and otherwise as stated in this chapter.

Violations of this section are subject to the fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

, unless bodily injury, serious bodily injury or death occurs to any person other than the offending operator under this section.

When bodily injury of any person other than the offending operator of any motor vehicle is caused by violation of this section, the offending operator shall be fined two hundred dollars ($200). When serious bodily injury of any person other than the offending operator of any motor vehicle is caused by violation of this section, the offending operator shall be fined five hundred dollars ($500) and his/her driver’s license shall be suspended for a period of three (3) months. When the death of any person other than the offending operator of any motor vehicle is caused by violation of this section, the offending operator shall be fined one thousand dollars ($1,000) and his/her driver’s license shall be suspended for a period of one year.

As used in this section, “serious bodily injury” means physical injury that creates a substantial risk of death or causes serious physical disfigurement or protracted loss or impairment of the function of any bodily member or organ.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 28, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-17-1

; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 65; P.L. 2013, ch. 339, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 414, § 2.

31-17-2.
Vehicle turning left or right.

The driver of a vehicle within an intersection intended to turn to the left or right shall yield the right-of-way to any vehicle approaching from the opposite direction which is within the intersection or so close to it as to constitute an immediate hazard, or shall yield to a pedestrian intending to cross within a crosswalk which the driver of the vehicle must travel to make the left or right turn. The driver, having so yielded and having given a signal when and as required by chapter 16 of this title, may make the left or right turn, and the drivers of all other vehicles approaching the intersection from the opposite direction shall yield the right of way to the vehicle making the left or right turn. Violations of this section are subject to the fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

, unless bodily injury, serious bodily injury or death occurs to any person other than the offending operator under this section.

When bodily injury of any person other than the offending operator of any motor vehicle is caused by violation of this section, the offending operator shall be fined two hundred dollars ($200). When serious bodily injury of any person other than the offending operator of any motor vehicle is caused by violation of this section, the offending operator shall be fined five hundred dollars ($500) and his/her driver’s license shall be suspended for a period of three (3) months. When the death of any person other than the offending operator of any motor vehicle is caused by violation of this section, the offending operator shall be fined one thousand dollars ($1,000) and his/her driver’s license shall be suspended for a period of one year.

As used in this section, “serious bodily injury” means physical injury that creates a substantial risk of death or causes serious physical disfigurement or protracted loss or impairment of the function of any bodily member or organ.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 28, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-17-2

; P.L. 1999, ch. 383, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 65; P.L. 2013, ch. 339, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 414, § 2.

31-17-3.
Intersection with through highway.

The driver of a vehicle shall stop at the entrance to a through highway and shall yield the right-of-way to other vehicles which have entered the intersection from the through highway, or which are approaching so closely on the through highway as to constitute an immediate hazard, but the driver having so yielded may proceed and the drivers of all other vehicles approaching the intersection on the through highway shall yield the right-of-way to the vehicle so proceeding into or across the through highway. Violations of this section are subject to the fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 28, § 3; P.L. 1952, ch. 2937, § 13; G.L. 1956, § 13-17-3; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 65.

31-17-4.
Vehicle entering stop or yield intersection.

Preferential right-of-way at an intersection may be indicated by stop signs or yield signs.

Except when directed to proceed by a police officer or traffic-control signal, every driver of a vehicle approaching a stop intersection indicated by a stop sign shall stop at a clearly marked stop line, but if none, before entering the crosswalk on the near side of the intersection, or, if none, then at the point nearest the intersecting roadway where the driver has a view of approaching traffic on the intersecting roadway before entering the intersection. After having stopped, the driver shall yield the right-of-way to any pedestrian intending to cross the lane of traffic in a crosswalk or any vehicle which has entered the intersection from another highway or which is approaching so closely on the highway as to constitute an immediate hazard during the time when the driver is moving across or within the intersection.

The driver of a vehicle approaching a yield sign shall, in obedience to the sign, slow down to a speed reasonable for the existing conditions and, if required for safety to stop, shall stop at a clearly marked stop line, but if none, before entering the crosswalk on the near side of the intersection, or, if none, then at the point nearest the intersecting roadway where the driver has a view of approaching traffic on the intersecting roadway. After slowing or stopping, the driver shall yield the right-of-way to any pedestrian intending to cross the lane of traffic in a crosswalk or any vehicle in the intersection or approaching on another highway so closely as to constitute an immediate hazard during the time the driver is moving across or within the intersection.

Violations of this section are subject to the fines enumerated in section

31-41.1-4

, unless bodily injury, serious bodily injury or death occurs to any person other than the offending operator under this section.

When bodily injury of any person other than the offending operator of any motor vehicle is caused by violation of this section, the offending operator shall be fined two hundred dollars ($200). When serious bodily injury of any person other than the offending operator of any motor vehicle is caused by violation of this section, the offending operator shall be fined five hundred dollars ($500) and his/her driver’s license shall be suspended for a period of three (3) months. When the death of any person other than the offending operator of any motor vehicle is caused by violation of this section, the offending operator shall be fined one thousand dollars ($1,000) and his/her driver’s license shall be suspended for a period of one year.

As used in this section, “serious bodily injury” means physical injury that creates a substantial risk of death or causes serious physical disfigurement or protracted loss or impairment of the function of any bodily member or organ.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 28, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

31-17-4

; P.L. 1970, ch. 106, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 383, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 65; P.L. 2013, ch. 339, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 414, § 2.

31-17-5.
Entering from private road or driveway.

The driver of a vehicle about to enter or cross a highway from a private road or driveway shall yield the right-of-way to all vehicles approaching on the highway and to all pedestrians attempting to cross the private road driveway or highway. Violations of this section are subject to the fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 28, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

31-17-5

; P.L. 1999, ch. 383, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 65.

31-17-5.1.
Penalties.

Any person who violates any provision of §§

31-17-1

—

31-17-5

, pertaining to the right-of-way of pedestrians, upon conviction, shall be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than seventy-five ($75.00).

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 383, § 4; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 65.

31-17-6.
Yielding to emergency vehicle.

Upon the immediate approach of an authorized emergency vehicle equipped with at least one lighted lamp exhibiting any one or combination of red, blue, or white light visible under normal atmospheric conditions from a distance of five hundred feet (500´) to the front of the vehicle, and producing an audible signal by siren, exhaust whistle, or bell, the driver of every other vehicle shall yield the right-of-way and shall immediately drive to a position parallel to, and as close as possible to, the right-hand edge or curb of the roadway clear of any intersection and shall stop and remain in that position until the authorized emergency vehicle has passed, except when otherwise directed by a police officer.

This section shall not operate to relieve the driver of an authorized emergency vehicle from the duty to drive with due regard for the safety of all persons using the highway.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 28, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

31-17-6

; P.L. 1993, ch. 369, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 446, § 1.

31-17-7.
Right-of-way of fire companies.

The officers and men and women of the fire department, of any fire engine or hose company, or of any protective department or company duly chartered and organized under the laws of this state for the protection of property from fire in any city or town, with their registered fire apparatus, shall have the right of way while going to a fire or upon any alarm of fire, while responding to an emergency call; when on duty at any fire, in, upon, or through any street, highway, lane, avenue, or alley in the city or town; and when exiting or entering a fire station, garage or other department facility. Every person in or upon or owning any vehicle, or upon the street, highway, lane, avenue, or alley, who shall willfully or maliciously refuse the right of way to, or shall in any way willfully or maliciously obstruct or retard any registered fire apparatus of the fire department, fire company, protective department, or company, or any of the officers or men and women, while going to a fire or upon any alarm of fire, while responding to an emergency call, or while on duty at any fire, in, upon, or through the street, highway, lane, avenue, or alley, or when exiting or entering a fire station, garage or other department facility shall be fined not exceeding two hundred dollars ($200). However, the rights pursuant to this section of the protective department or company shall be subject, at all times, to the rights pursuant to this section of the fire department, fire engine company, and hose company.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 54; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 57; P.L. 1910, ch. 539, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 57; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 65; G.L. 1956, §

31-17-7

; P.L. 2000, ch. 193, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 339, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 414, § 2.

31-17-8.
Right-of-way at rotary.

In the absence of any traffic control device or sign, the driver of a vehicle about to enter a rotary, regardless of the direction from which the vehicle is approaching, shall yield the right-of-way to all vehicles already in the rotary. The state traffic commission shall determine the location of yield signs at rotaries. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

, unless bodily injury, serious bodily injury or death occurs to any person other than the offending operator under this section.

When bodily injury of any person other than the offending operator of any motor vehicle is caused by violation of this section, the offending operator shall be fined two hundred dollars ($200). When serious bodily injury of any person other than the offending operator of any motor vehicle is caused by violation of this section, the offending operator shall be fined five hundred dollars ($500) and his/her driver’s license shall be suspended for a period of three (3) months. When the death of any person other than the offending operator of any motor vehicle is caused by violation of this section, the offending operator shall be fined one thousand dollars ($1,000) and his/her driver’s license shall be suspended for a period of one year.

As used in this section, “serious bodily injury” means physical injury that creates a substantial risk of death or causes serious physical disfigurement or protracted loss or impairment of the function of any bodily member or organ.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 138, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 207, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 112; P.L. 2013, ch. 339, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 414, § 2.

31-17-9.
Yielding to riders on bicycle lane.

The driver of a vehicle about to cross or to turn left or right across a bicycle lane shall yield the right-of-way to any person operating a bicycle or motorized wheelchair upon the bicycle lane.

Any driver of a vehicle convicted of violating the provisions of this section shall be subject to the fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 64, § 3; P.L. 2005, ch. 67, § 3; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 12, § 7.